Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
PRETRIAL RELEASE
SECTION 1.  ORS 135.233 is amended to read:
135.233. (1) The presiding judge of a judicial  district shall enter a standing pretrial release order
specifying to the sheriff  of the county, or to the entity supervising the local correctional facility
responsible for pretrial incarceration within the judicial district, those persons and offenses:
(a) Subject to release on recognizance;
(b) Subject to release with special conditions as specified in the order; and
(c) That are not eligible for release until arraignment.
(2) The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court, with input  from a criminal justice advisory com-
mittee appointed  by the Chief Justice, shall establish release guidelines for the pretrial release or-
ders described in this section to:
(a) Provide consistent release decision-making structure across the state;
(b) Reduce reliance on the use of security;
(c) Include provisions for victim notification and input; and
(d) Balance the rights of the defendant  and presumption of pretrial release against community
and victim safety and the risk of failure to appear.
(3) Any standing  pretrial release order entered under subsection (1) of this section does
not affect the authority of a magistrate to make a release decision under ORS 135.245 and
to consider,  when making the release decision, the primary and secondary release criteria,
including community safety and the risk of failure to appear by the defendant.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 135.230 is amended to read:
135.230. As used in ORS 135.230 to 135.290, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Abuse” means:
(a) Attempting to cause or intentionally, knowingly or recklessly causing physical injury;
(b) Intentionally, knowingly or recklessly placing another in fear of  imminent serious physical
injury; or
(c) Committing sexual abuse in any degree as defined in ORS 163.415, 163.425 and 163.427.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1516 (SB 1516-A) Page 1
(2) “Conditional release” means  a nonsecurity release which imposes regulations on the activ-
ities and associations of the defendant.
(3) “Domestic violence” means abuse between family or household members.
(4) “Family or household members” means any of the following:
(a) Spouses.
(b) Former spouses.
(c) Adult persons related by blood or marriage.
(d) Persons cohabiting with each other.
(e) Persons who  have cohabited with each other or who have been involved in a sexually inti-
mate relationship.
(f) Unmarried parents of a minor child.
(5) “Magistrate” has the meaning provided for this term in ORS 133.030.
(6) “Personal  recognizance” means the release of a defendant upon the promise of the defendant
to appear in court at all appropriate times.
(7) “Primary release criteria” includes the following:
(a) The reasonable protection of the victim or public;
(b) The nature of the current charge;
(c) The defendant’s prior criminal record,  if any, and, if the defendant previously has been re-
leased pending trial, whether the defendant appeared as required;
(d) Any facts indicating the possibility of violations of law if the  defendant is released without
regulations; and
(e) Any  other facts tending to indicate [ that] whether the defendant is likely to appear  as re-
quired.
(8) “Release” means temporary or partial freedom of a defendant  from lawful custody before
judgment of conviction or after judgment of conviction if defendant has appealed.
(9) “Release  agreement” means a sworn writing by the defendant stating the terms of the release
and, if applicable, the amount of security.
(10) “Release decision” means a determination by a magistrate, using  primary and secondary
release criteria, which establishes the form of the release  most likely to ensure the safety of the
public and the victim, the  defendant’s court appearance and that the defendant does not engage in
domestic violence while on release.
(11) “Secondary release criteria” includes the following:
(a) The defendant’s employment status and history and financial condition;
(b) The nature and extent of the family relationships of the defendant;
(c) The past and present residences of the defendant;
(d) Names of persons who agree  to assist the defendant in attending court at the proper time;
and
(e) Any facts tending to indicate that the defendant has strong ties to the community.
(12) “Security release” means a release conditioned on a promise to appear in  court at all ap-
propriate times which is secured by cash, stocks, bonds or real property.
(13) “Surety” is  one who executes a security release and binds oneself to pay the security
amount if the defendant fails to comply with the release agreement.
AUTOMATED LICENSE PLATE RECOGNITION SYSTEMS
SECTION 3.
Definitions. As used in sections 3 to 9 of this 2026 Act:
(1) “Alert” means a notification  generated by an automated license plate recognition
system indicating that a vehicle’s license  plate number or other vehicle characteristics
match information contained in a  hot list or database described in section 4 of this 2026 Act.
(2) “Authorized user” means a law enforcement officer or  other employee of a law
enforcement agency who is authorized to deploy or use an automated license plate recogni-
Enrolled Senate Bill 1516 (SB 1516-A) Page 2
tion system or captured license plate data in accordance with the  provisions of sections 3 to
9 of this 2026 Act.
(3)(a) “Automated license plate recognition system” means one or more  high-speed
cameras combined with  computer algorithms used to convert images of license plates or
other vehicle characteristics into computer-readable data.
(b) “Automated license plate recognition system” does  not include a photo red light
camera described in ORS  810.434 when used for enforcement of ORS 811.265 or a photo radar
unit when used for enforcement of ORS 811.111.
(4) “Captured  license plate data” means the global positioning system coordinates, date
and time, video, photograph,  license plate number, vehicle characteristics or any other re-
lated data or information collected by an automated license plate recognition system.
(5) “Hot list” means a database created or maintained by  a law enforcement agency that
identifies vehicles used to facilitate the commission of a crime or violation or to  avoid ap-
prehension for commission of a crime, or that are associated with a missing or  endangered
person.
(6) “Law enforcement agency” has the meaning given that term in ORS 181A.775.
(7) “Law enforcement purpose” means an authorized use of an automated license  plate
recognition system or captured license plate data under section 4 of this 2026 Act.
(8) “Secured area” means an area, enclosed by clear boundaries, to  which access is lim-
ited or not open to the public  and entry is obtainable only through specific access control
points.
SECTION 4.
Authorized uses of ALPR systems by  law enforcement; requirements for
use. (1) Except as provided under sections 3 to 9 of this 2026 Act, a law enforcement agency
may not use an automated license plate recognition system or captured license plate data.
(2) A law enforcement agency may use  an automated license plate recognition system
or captured license plate data for the purpose of:
(a) Identifying a vehicle that was used to  facilitate the commission of a crime or used
to avoid apprehension for commission of a crime, if the crime:
(A) Constitutes a crime under the laws of this state;
(B) If  committed in another state or jurisdiction, constitutes a crime that is substantially
equivalent to a crime under the laws of this state; or
(C) Constitutes a federal crime and the  use is not contrary to the public policies set forth
in ORS 24.500 or any law of this state restricting the use of public resources for  prohibited
enforcement activities, including ORS 181A.250, 181A.820 and 181A.826;
(b) Identifying a vehicle that was used to facilitate the commission of a violation as de-
scribed in ORS 153.008, excluding a traffic violation as defined in ORS 801.557;
(c) Identifying a vehicle that is registered to a person  for whom there is an outstanding
criminal warrant for arrest, if the warrant is:
(A) For a crime that constitutes a crime under the laws of this state;
(B) For a crime that, if committed  in another state or jurisdiction, constitutes a crime
that is substantially equivalent to a crime under the laws of this state; or
(C) A federal judicial warrant for arrest and the use is not contrary to the  public policies
set forth in ORS 24.500 or any law of this state restricting the use of public  resources for
prohibited enforcement activities, including ORS 181A.250, 181A.820 and 181A.826;
(d) Identifying a vehicle that  is associated with a missing or endangered person, including
a person who is the subject of an Amber Alert or Silver Alert;
(e) Identifying an uninsured vehicle, as that term is defined in ORS 742.504;
(f) Identifying a vehicle that is  not registered as required under the Oregon Vehicle Code;
(g) Regulating the use of parking facilities; or
(h) Controlling access to secured areas.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1516 (SB 1516-A) Page 3
(3)(a) For captured  license plate data not related to a court proceeding or ongoing crim-
inal investigation, the captured license plate data may be retained for no more than  30 days
after the captured license plate data is collected.
(b) For captured license plate data related  to a court proceeding or ongoing criminal in-
vestigation, the captured  license plate data may be retained for the same period of time that
evidence is retained in the normal course of the court’s business.
(c) Paragraphs (a) and (b)  of this subsection do not apply to the audit information de-
scribed in section 6 of this 2026 Act.
(4)(a) A law  enforcement agency may compare captured license plate data with informa-
tion contained in:
(A) Records held by the Department of Transportation;
(B) The databases of the National Crime  Information Center maintained by the Federal
Bureau of Investigation;
(C) The Law Enforcement Data  System maintained by the Department of State Police
or an equivalent system maintained by another state;
(D) The records of the Federal Bureau of Investigation  related to kidnappings and miss-
ing persons;
(E) The missing children and adults clearinghouse established under ORS 181A.300; or
(F) Hot lists created or maintained by the  law enforcement agency using the automated
license plate recognition system or equivalent  databases created or maintained by an agency
of another state that enforces criminal laws.
(b) A law  enforcement agency may compare captured license plate data only with infor-
mation contained in a system,  hot list or database described in paragraph (a)(C) or (F) of this
subsection if the system, hot list or database is updated  frequently enough to ensure the
information contained therein is accurate, relevant, timely and complete.
(c) A law enforcement officer or other employee of a law enforcement agency who adds
a license plate number, vehicle description or other entry to a  hot list must include in the
entry:
(A) The specific law enforcement purpose for the entry;
(B) The name of the officer or other employee who adds the entry; and
(C) If the officer or other employee adds the entry on behalf of  another employee of the
law enforcement agency, the name of that other employee.
(5) A law enforcement officer or other employee  of a law enforcement agency who
searches captured license plate data collected by an automated license  plate recognition
system under this section shall include the following information in the search  entry log for
the automated license plate recognition system:
(a) The authorized user identifier of the person who conducts the search;
(b) The law enforcement agency that employs the person who conducts the search;
(c) The search inputs used;
(d) The date and time of the search;
(e) Any applicable case or reference number;
(f) The law enforcement purpose for the search; and
(g) If the search is related to an investigation of a  crime or violation, the specific type
of crime or violation being investigated.
(6) Before a law enforcement officer conducts a traffic stop  of a driver of a motor vehicle
based on an alert, the law enforcement officer or other authorized user shall visually confirm
that the vehicle’s license plate number, issuing  state and other vehicle characteristics match
the alert and that the traffic stop complies with agency policy and applicable law.
(7) A law enforcement agency may request access  to captured license plate data collected
by a private person or entity or  non-law enforcement agency, provided that the law
enforcement agency accesses or otherwise uses the data for a law enforcement purpose.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1516 (SB 1516-A) Page 4
SECTION 5. Data sharing limitations for law enforcement agencies. (1) A law  enforce-
ment agency may allow queries of the agency’s captured license plate data by  another law
enforcement agency.
(2)(a) Except as provided in paragraph  (b) of this subsection, a law enforcement agency
may not provide access to captured license plate data to any government entity  or agency
not created pursuant to the Oregon Constitution, or the laws or regulations of this state.
(b) A law  enforcement agency may provide captured license plate data to a government
entity or agency not created pursuant to the Oregon Constitution, or the  laws or regulations
of this state for a  law enforcement purpose in accordance with sections 3 to 9 of this 2026
Act. Captured license plate data provided under this  subsection must be limited to data rel-
evant to the law enforcement purpose and may not include unrestricted or  ongoing access
to captured license plate data. A law enforcement agency that provides captured license plate
data under this subsection must include the following information  in the search entry log for
the automated license plate recognition system:
(A) The information required under section 4 (5) of this 2026 Act;
(B) The government agency or entity on whose behalf the search is conducted by the law
enforcement agency; and
(C) The number of cameras or devices that were accessed or used as part of the  search.
(3) Nothing in this section prohibits a law enforcement agency from providing  access to
captured license plate data as may be required  by a judicial subpoena issued as part of a
court proceeding or by another compulsory court-issued legal process.
SECTION 6.
ALPR system  audits provided by vendor. (1) A vendor that contracts with
a law enforcement agency to  provide the agency with an automated license plate recognition
system or related services shall provide to the agency a monthly audit of the  system that is
searchable and includes the following information for the preceding 30-day period:
(a) The number of automated license plate  recognition systems installed, including cam-
eras and devices;
(b) The location of any fixed or permanent automated license plate  recognition system,
including cameras and devices;
(c) The number of searches of captured license plate data  collected by the automated li-
cense plate recognition system;
(d) A list of any law enforcement agency  that has access to the automated license plate
recognition system;
(e) The number of authorized users for the automated license plate recognition system;
(f) The number of  unique vehicles captured by the automated license plate recognition
system;
(g) The number of alerts generated by the automated license plate recognition system;
(h) The number of cameras or devices that were accessed or used by the law enforcement
agency; and
(i) For any search of captured  license plate data collected by the automated license plate
recognition system:
(A) The authorized user identifier of the person who conducts the search;
(B) The date and time of the search; and
(C) The law enforcement purpose entered for the search.
(2) A vendor that contracts with a law enforcement agency to provide the agency with
an automated license plate recognition system or related  services shall provide to the agency
a quarterly audit of the system that is  searchable and includes the following information for
any search of  captured license plate data collected by the automated license plate recognition
system that is conducted  during the preceding quarter on behalf of any government agency
or entity that is not the law enforcement agency:
(a) The authorized user identifier of the person who conducts the search;
(b) The law enforcement agency that employs the person who conducts the search;
Enrolled Senate Bill 1516 (SB 1516-A) Page 5
(c) The government agency or entity on whose  behalf the search is conducted by the law
enforcement agency;
(d) The date and time of the search;
(e) The law enforcement purpose entered for the search; and
(f) The number of cameras or devices that were accessed or used as part of the search.
(3)(a) A  law enforcement agency that receives an audit from a vendor under subsection
(1) or (2) of this section shall publish the results of the audit on  the agency’s website within
two days of receiving the audit or, in the  alternative, may require the vendor to provide di-
rect public access to the results of the audit within two days of receiving the audit.
(b) Audit results published by a law enforcement agency or provided to the public by  a
vendor under paragraph (a) of  this subsection must be in accordance with the provisions of
ORS 192.345 (44)(a).
SECTION 7.
Law enforcement agency  policies and procedures regarding ALPR systems;
requirements. (1) Before deploying or using  an automated license plate recognition system
or captured license  plate data, a law enforcement agency shall establish and publish policies
and procedures for  the use of an automated license plate recognition system and the use,
storage and retention of captured license plate data  in accordance with sections 3 to 9 of this
2026 Act.
(2) The policies and procedures described in subsection (1) of this section must include:
(a) Requirements  to ensure the security of the automated license plate recognition sys-
tem and resulting captured license plate data,  including rules governing access to the system
and data;
(b) Requirements to ensure that information contained in any  hot list created or main-
tained by the law enforcement agency is accurate, relevant, timely and complete;
(c) Training requirements  for any authorized users regarding the deployment, use and
security of the automated license plate recognition system and captured license plate data;
(d) Requirements for the retention and destruction of captured license plate data;
(e) A requirement that any contract with a third  party vendor for an automated license
plate recognition system or related services must include terms providing that:
(A) Captured license plate  data collected by the automated license plate recognition sys-
tem is the property of the law enforcement agency,  is not owned by the vendor and may not
be used by or licensed to the vendor for any  purpose inconsistent with the policies and pro-
cedures of the law enforcement agency or the provisions of sections 3 to 9 of this 2026 Act;
(B) Any request received by the  vendor for access to captured license plate data collected
by the automated license plate recognition system, including  through a judicial warrant, ju-
dicial subpoena or  administrative subpoena, must be directed exclusively to the law
enforcement agency that owns the captured license plate data;
(C) Captured license plate data must be encrypted  using, at a minimum, end-to-end en-
cryption;
(D) The vendor must be in compliance with the most current version of the Federal  Bu-
reau of Investigation Criminal Justice Information Services Security Policy,  including, as
applicable, execution of the Federal Bureau  of Investigation Criminal Justice Information
Services Security Addendum, audit rights and prompt notification of security incidents; and
(E) The vendor may be held liable for the vendor’s  misuse or improper release of cap-
tured license plate data collected by the automated license  plate recognition system, includ-
ing damages for the misuse or improper release;
(f) Requirements for audit processes under section 6 of this 2026 Act; and
(g) A prohibition on the use  of any captured license plate data collected by the automated
license plate recognition system for any purpose not  in accordance with sections 3 to 9 of
this 2026 Act.
SECTION 8.
Exception for existing ALPR contracts. (1) Notwithstanding section 7 of this
2026 Act, if a law enforcement agency has deployed or is using  an automated license plate
Enrolled Senate Bill 1516 (SB 1516-A) Page 6
recognition system on or after the effective date of  this 2026 Act pursuant to a contract with
a third party  vendor for an automated license plate recognition system or related services
that was entered into prior to  the effective date of this 2026 Act, the law enforcement agency
may use  the automated license plate recognition system in accordance with the terms of the
existing contract  for the duration of the contract. The law enforcement agency may not ex-
tend or renew the contract or enter into a new contract  with a third party vendor for an
automated license plate recognition  system unless the law enforcement agency and any ex-
tended, renewed or new contract will  be in compliance with the requirements of sections 3
to 9 of this 2026 Act on and after  the date on which the contract is extended, renewed or
entered into.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1)  of this section, a law enforcement agency that uses
an automated license plate recognition system on or after the effective  date of this 2026 Act
shall comply with the provisions of section 4 of this 2026 Act regardless of the date on which
the agency enters, renews or extends a  contract with a third party vendor for an automated
license plate recognition system or related services.
SECTION 9. Action for improper access or disclosure of captured  license plate data; ex-
ceptions; attorney fees. (1)(a) A vendor that contracts with a law  enforcement agency to
provide an automated license plate recognition system  or related services may not access,
disclose, sell, share or otherwise use captured license  plate data collected by the automated
license plate recognition system.
(b) It is not a violation of paragraph (a) of this subsection for a vendor to:
(A) Access  captured license plate data collected by an automated license plate recogni-
tion system for the limited duration and purpose of providing technical support to  the law
enforcement agency for the system  or data if the agency grants express consent for that
duration and purpose; or
(B) Provide the audit information described under section 6 of this 2026 Act to a  law
enforcement agency.
(2) If  a vendor intentionally or with gross negligence accesses, discloses, sells, shares or
otherwise uses captured license plate data related to an individual  in violation of subsection
(1)(a) of this section, the individual may bring a civil  action against the vendor for economic
and noneconomic damages and equitable relief. If a court awards damages or equitable relief
to the individual, the court may award reasonable attorney fees to the individual.
(3) Any person may bring a civil action against a vendor that violates subsection  (1)(a)
of this section to enjoin the violation.
(4) The causes of action  provided in this section are the exclusive remedies in law or
equity for violation of subsection (1)(a) of this section.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 137.865 is amended to read:
137.865. (1) The Organized Retail Theft Grant Program is established to assist:
(a) Cities and counties with the costs incurred by local law enforcement agencies  in addressing
organized retail theft; and
(b) The Department of Justice with  costs incurred by the department in addressing organized
retail theft.
(2) The Oregon Criminal  Justice Commission shall administer the grant program described in
subsection (1) of this section and shall award the grants described in this section.
(3) The commission may adopt rules to administer the grant program, including:
(a) A methodology for reviewing and approving grant applications and awarding grants;
(b) A process for distributing any unallocated funds;
(c) A process for evaluating the efficacy  of programs and services funded by the grant program;
(d) Provisions related to requests by grant recipients to adjust their grant awards; and
(e) Provisions related to partnerships or collaborations between applicants.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1516 (SB 1516-A) Page 7
(4)(a) Moneys distributed to  grant recipients under this section must be spent on costs associ-
ated with addressing  and prosecuting organized retail theft and may be used for the purchase of
equipment.
(b) The use of any automated license plate recognition system, as defined in section 3 of
this 2026 Act, purchased under this section must comply with  the provisions of sections 3 to
9 of this 2026 Act.
(5) As used in this section, “equipment” means any  item used by peace officers, deputy district
attorneys or retail asset protection investigators in detecting, investigating, documenting or  adjudi-
cating organized retail theft activities.
SECTION 11.  ORS 192.345 is amended to read:
192.345. The following public records are exempt from disclosure  under ORS 192.311 to 192.478
unless the public interest requires disclosure in the particular instance:
(1) Records of a public body pertaining to litigation to which the public body is a  party if the
complaint has been filed, or if the complaint has not  been filed, if the public body shows that such
litigation is reasonably likely to occur. This exemption does  not apply to litigation which has been
concluded, and nothing in this subsection shall  limit any right or opportunity granted by discovery
or deposition statutes to a party to litigation or potential litigation.
(2) Trade secrets.  “Trade secrets,” as used in this section, may include, but are not limited to,
any formula, plan, pattern, process,  tool, mechanism, compound, procedure, production data, or
compilation of information which is not patented, which is  known only to certain individuals within
an organization and which is used in a business it conducts, having  actual or potential commercial
value, and which gives its user an opportunity to obtain a business advantage over competitors who
do not know or use it.
(3) Investigatory information compiled for  criminal law purposes. The record of an arrest or the
report of a crime shall be disclosed unless and only for so long as there is a clear need to  delay
disclosure in the course of a specific investigation, including the need  to protect the complaining
party or the victim. Nothing in this subsection shall  limit any right constitutionally guaranteed,
or granted by statute, to disclosure or discovery in criminal cases. For purposes  of this subsection,
the record of an arrest or the report of a crime includes, but is not limited to:
(a) The arrested  person’s name, age, residence, employment, marital status and similar bi-
ographical information;
(b) The offense with which the arrested person is charged;
(c) The conditions of release pursuant to ORS 135.230 to 135.290;
(d) The identity of and biographical information concerning both complaining party and victim;
(e) The identity of the investigating and arresting agency and the length of the investigation;
(f) The circumstances of  arrest, including time, place, resistance, pursuit and weapons used; and
(g) Such information as may be necessary to enlist  public assistance in apprehending fugitives
from justice.
(4) Test questions, scoring keys, and other  data used to administer a licensing examination,
employment, academic or other  examination or testing procedure before the examination is given
and if the examination is to be used again.  Records establishing procedures for and instructing
persons administering, grading or evaluating an examination  or testing procedure are included in
this exemption, to the extent that disclosure would create a risk that the result might be affected.
(5) Information consisting of  production records, sale or purchase records or catch records, or
similar business records of a private concern or enterprise,  required by law to be submitted to or
inspected  by  a governmental body to allow it to determine fees or assessments payable or to estab-
lish production quotas, and the amounts of  such fees or assessments payable or paid, to the extent
that such information is in a form  that would permit identification of the individual concern or en-
terprise. This exemption does not include records submitted by long term care facilities as defined
in ORS 442.015 to the state  for purposes of reimbursement of expenses or determining fees for pa-
tient care. Nothing in this subsection shall limit the use that can be  made of such information for
regulatory purposes or its admissibility in any enforcement proceeding.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1516 (SB 1516-A) Page 8
(6) Information relating to the appraisal of real estate prior to its acquisition.
(7) The names and  signatures of employees who sign authorization cards or petitions for the
purpose of requesting representation or decertification elections.
(8) Investigatory information relating to any complaint filed under ORS 659A.820 or 659A.825,
until such time as the complaint is resolved under ORS 659A.835,  or a final order is issued under
ORS 659A.850.
(9) Investigatory information relating to any  complaint or charge filed under ORS 243.676 and
663.180.
(10) Records, reports and other information received or compiled by the Director of the  De-
partment of Consumer and Business Services under ORS 697.732.
(11) Information concerning the location of archaeological sites or  objects as those terms are
defined in ORS 358.905, except if the governing body of an Indian tribe requests  the information and
the need for the information is related to that Indian tribe’s cultural or  religious activities. This
exemption does not include information relating to a site  that is all or part of an existing, commonly
known and publicized tourist facility or attraction.
(12) A personnel discipline action, or materials or documents supporting that action.
(13) Fish and wildlife information developed pursuant to ORS 496.004, 496.172  and 498.026 or
ORS 496.192 and 564.100, regarding the habitat, location or population of any threatened  species or
endangered species.
(14) Writings prepared by or under the direction of faculty of public  educational institutions, in
connection with research, until publicly released, copyrighted or patented.
(15) Computer programs  developed or purchased by or for any public body for its own use. As
used in  this subsection, “computer program” means a series of instructions or statements which
permit the functioning of a computer system in a manner designed  to provide storage, retrieval and
manipulation of data from such computer system, and any associated  documentation and source
material that  explain how to operate the computer program. “Computer program” does not include:
(a) The original data, including but not limited to numbers, text, voice, graphics and images;
(b) Analyses, compilations and other manipulated forms of the original data produced  by use of
the program; or
(c) The mathematical and statistical formulas which would be used if  the manipulated forms of
the original data were to be produced manually.
(16) Data and information provided by participants to mediation under ORS 36.256.
(17) Investigatory information relating to any complaint or charge  filed under ORS chapter 654,
until a final administrative  determination is made or, if a citation is issued, until an employer re-
ceives notice of any citation.
(18) Specific operational plans  in connection with an anticipated threat to individual or public
safety for deployment and use  of personnel and equipment, prepared or used by a public body, if
public disclosure of the  plans would endanger an individual’s life or physical safety or jeopardize a
law enforcement activity.
(19)(a) Audits or audit reports  required of a telecommunications carrier. As used in this para-
graph, “audit or audit report” means any external  or internal audit or audit report pertaining to a
telecommunications carrier, as defined in ORS 133.721, or pertaining to a corporation having an af-
filiated interest, as defined in ORS 759.390, with a telecommunications carrier that  is intended to
make the operations of the entity more efficient,  accurate or compliant with applicable rules, pro-
cedures or standards, that may  include self-criticism and that has been filed by the telecommuni-
cations carrier or affiliate under compulsion of state  law. “Audit or audit report” does not mean an
audit of a cost study that would be  discoverable in a contested case proceeding and that is not
subject to a protective order; and
(b) Financial statements. As used in this paragraph, “financial  statement” means a financial
statement of a nonregulated corporation having an  affiliated interest, as defined in ORS 759.390,
with a telecommunications carrier, as defined in ORS 133.721.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1516 (SB 1516-A) Page 9
(20) The residence address of an elector if authorized under  ORS 247.965 and subject to ORS
247.967.
(21) The following records, communications and information submitted to a housing authority
as defined in ORS 456.005, or to an urban renewal agency as defined in ORS  457.010, by applicants
for and recipients of loans, grants and tax credits:
(a) Personal and corporate financial statements and information, including tax returns;
(b) Credit reports;
(c) Project  appraisals, excluding appraisals obtained in the course of transactions involving an
interest in real estate that is acquired, leased, rented,  exchanged, transferred or otherwise disposed
of as part of the project, but only after the transactions have closed and are concluded;
(d) Market studies and analyses;
(e) Articles of incorporation, partnership agreements and operating agreements;
(f) Commitment letters;
(g) Project pro forma statements;
(h) Project cost certifications and cost data;
(i) Audits;
(j) Project tenant correspondence requested to be confidential;
(k) Tenant files relating to certification; and
(L) Housing assistance payment requests.
(22) Records or information that, if disclosed, would allow a person to:
(a) Gain unauthorized access to buildings or other property;
(b) Identify those areas of structural or operational  vulnerability that would permit unlawful
disruption to, or interference with, services; or
(c) Disrupt, interfere with or gain unauthorized access to public funds or  to information proc-
essing, communication or telecommunication systems,  including the information contained in the
systems, that are used or operated by a public body.
(23) Records or information that would  reveal or otherwise identify security measures, or
weaknesses or potential weaknesses in  security measures, taken or recommended to be taken to
protect:
(a) An individual;
(b) Buildings or other property;
(c) Information processing, communication or telecommunication systems, including the  infor-
mation contained in the systems; or
(d) Those operations of the  Oregon State Lottery the security of which are subject to study and
evaluation under ORS 461.180 (6).
(24) Personal information held by or under the  direction of officials of the Oregon Health and
Science University or a public university  listed in ORS 352.002 about a person who has or who is
interested in donating money or property to the Oregon  Health and Science University or a public
university, if the information is related  to the family of the person, personal assets of the person
or is incidental information not related to the donation.
(25) The home address, professional address and telephone number of a person who  has or who
is interested in donating money or property to a public university listed in ORS 352.002.
(26) Records of the name  and address of a person who files a report with or pays an assessment
to a commodity commission established under ORS 576.051 to 576.455, the  Oregon Beef Council
created under ORS 577.210 or the Oregon Wheat Commission created under ORS 578.030.
(27) Information  provided to, obtained by or used by a public body to authorize, originate, re-
ceive or authenticate a transfer of funds, including but not limited  to a credit card number, payment
card expiration date, password, financial institution account number and financial institution routing
number.
(28) Social Security numbers as provided in ORS 107.840.
(29) The electronic mail  address of a student who attends a public university listed in ORS
352.002 or Oregon Health and Science University.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1516 (SB 1516-A) Page 10
(30) The name, home address, professional address or location of a person that is  engaged in,
or that provides goods or services for, medical research  at Oregon Health and Science University
that is  conducted using animals other than rodents. This subsection does not apply to Oregon Health
and Science University press releases, websites or other publications circulated to the general
public.
(31) If requested by a public safety officer, as defined in ORS 181A.355, or a county  juvenile
department employee who is charged with and primarily performs duties related to  the custody,
control or supervision of adjudicated youths confined in a detention facility, as  defined in ORS
419A.004:
(a) The home  address and home telephone number of the public safety officer or county juvenile
department employee contained in the voter registration records for the officer or employee.
(b) The home  address and home telephone number of the public safety officer or county juvenile
department employee contained in records of the Department of  Public Safety Standards and
Training.
(c) The name of the public  safety officer or county juvenile department employee contained in
county real property assessment or taxation records. This exemption:
(A) Applies only to the name of the officer or employee and any  other owner of the property in
connection with a specific property identified by the officer or employee in a  request for exemption
from disclosure;
(B) Applies only to records that may be made immediately available to the  public upon request
in person, by telephone or using the Internet;
(C) Applies until the officer or employee requests termination of the exemption;
(D) Does not apply to disclosure of records among public bodies as defined in ORS 174.109 for
governmental purposes; and
(E) May not result in liability for the county if the name of  the officer or employee is disclosed
after a request for exemption from disclosure is made under this subsection.
(32) Unless the public records request is made by a financial institution,  as defined in ORS
706.008, consumer finance company licensed under ORS chapter 725, mortgage banker  or mortgage
broker licensed under  ORS 86A.095 to 86A.198, or title company for business purposes, records de-
scribed in paragraph  (a) of this subsection, if the exemption from disclosure of the records is sought
by an individual described in paragraph (b) of this subsection using the procedure  described in
paragraph (c) of this subsection:
(a) The home address, home or cellular telephone number or personal  electronic mail address
contained in the records of any public body that has received the request that is set forth in:
(A) A  warranty deed, deed of trust, mortgage, lien, deed of reconveyance, release, satisfaction,
substitution of trustee, easement, dog license,  marriage license or military discharge record that is
in the possession of the county clerk; or
(B) Any public record of a public body other than the county clerk.
(b) The individual claiming  the exemption from disclosure must be a district attorney, a deputy
district attorney, the Attorney General or an assistant attorney general, the United States Attorney
for the District of Oregon or an assistant  United States attorney for the District of Oregon, a city
attorney who engages in the prosecution  of criminal matters or a deputy city attorney who engages
in the prosecution of criminal matters.
(c) The individual claiming the exemption  from disclosure must do so by filing the claim in
writing with the public body for which the exemption from disclosure is being  claimed on a form
prescribed by the public body. Unless the  claim is filed with the county clerk, the claim form shall
list the public records in the possession of the public body to which the exemption applies.  The ex-
emption applies until the individual claiming the exemption requests termination  of the exemption
or ceases to qualify for the exemption.
(33) The following voluntary conservation agreements and reports:
(a) Land management plans  required for voluntary stewardship agreements entered into under
ORS 541.973; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 1516 (SB 1516-A) Page 11
(b) Written  agreements relating to the conservation of greater sage grouse entered into volun-
tarily by owners or occupiers of land with a soil and water  conservation district under ORS 568.550.
(34) Sensitive  business records or financial or commercial information of the State Accident In-
surance Fund Corporation that is not customarily provided to business competitors.  This exemption
does not:
(a) Apply to the formulas for determining dividends to be paid to  employers insured by the State
Accident Insurance Fund Corporation;
(b) Apply to contracts for advertising, public relations or lobbying services or to documents  re-
lated to the formation of such contracts;
(c) Apply to group insurance contracts  or to documents relating to the formation of such con-
tracts, except that employer account records shall remain exempt from disclosure  as provided in
ORS 192.355 (35); or
(d) Provide the basis for opposing  the discovery of documents in litigation pursuant to the ap-
plicable rules of civil procedure.
(35) Records of the Department  of Public Safety Standards and Training relating to investi-
gations conducted under ORS 181A.640 or 181A.870 (6), until the department issues the  report de-
scribed in ORS 181A.640 or 181A.870.
(36) A medical examiner’s report, autopsy report or laboratory test  report ordered by a medical
examiner under ORS 146.117.
(37) Any document or other information related to an audit of a public body, as  defined in ORS
174.109, that is in the custody of an auditor or audit organization operating under nationally  re-
cognized  government  auditing standards, until the auditor or audit organization issues a final audit
report in accordance with those standards or the audit is  abandoned. This exemption does not pro-
hibit disclosure of a draft audit report  that is provided to the audited entity for the entity’s response
to the audit findings.
(38)(a) Personally identifiable information collected as part of an electronic fare  collection sys-
tem of a mass transit system.
(b) The exemption from disclosure in paragraph (a) of this subsection  does not apply to public
records that have attributes of anonymity that are sufficient, or that are aggregated  into groupings
that are broad enough, to ensure that persons cannot be identified by disclosure of the public  re-
cords.
(c) As used in this subsection:
(A) “Electronic fare collection system” means the software and hardware used  for, associated
with or relating to the collection of transit fares for a mass transit  system, including but not limited
to computers, radio communication  systems, personal mobile devices, wearable technology, fare in-
struments, information technology, data storage or  collection equipment, or other equipment or im-
provements.
(B) “Mass transit system” has the meaning given that term in ORS 267.010.
(C) “Personally identifiable information” means all information  relating to a person that ac-
quires or uses a transit  pass or other fare payment medium in connection with an electronic fare
collection system, including but not limited to:
(i) Customer account  information, date of birth, telephone number, physical address, electronic
mail address, credit  or debit card information, bank account information, Social Security or taxpayer
identification number or other identification number, transit pass or fare payment medium balances
or history, or similar personal information; or
(ii) Travel dates, travel times, frequency of use, travel locations, service types or vehicle use,
or similar travel information.
(39)(a) If requested by a civil code enforcement officer:
(A) The home address  and home telephone number of the civil code enforcement officer con-
tained in the voter registration records for the officer.
(B) The name of the civil code enforcement officer contained in county  real property assessment
or taxation records. This exemption:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1516 (SB 1516-A) Page 12
(i) Applies only to  the name of the civil code enforcement officer and any other owner of the
property in connection with a specific property identified by the officer  in a request for exemption
from disclosure;
(ii) Applies only to records that  may be made immediately available to the public upon request
in person, by telephone or using the Internet;
(iii) Applies until the civil code enforcement officer requests termination of the exemption;
(iv) Does not apply  to disclosure of records among public bodies as defined in ORS 174.109 for
governmental purposes; and
(v) May not result in liability for the county  if the name of the civil code enforcement officer
is disclosed after a request for exemption from disclosure is made under this subsection.
(b) As used in this subsection, “civil code enforcement officer” means an  employee of a public
body, as defined in ORS 174.109, who is charged with enforcing laws or ordinances relating to land
use, zoning, use of rights-of-way, solid waste, hazardous waste, sewage treatment and  disposal or the
state building code.
(40) Audio or video recordings,  whether digital or analog, resulting from a law enforcement
officer’s operation of a video camera worn upon the  officer’s person that records the officer’s
interactions with members of the public while the officer is on  duty. When a recording described in
this subsection is subject to disclosure, the following apply:
(a) Recordings  that have been sealed in a court’s record of a court proceeding or otherwise or-
dered by a court not to be disclosed may not be disclosed.
(b) A request  for disclosure under this subsection must identify the approximate date and time
of an incident for which the recordings are requested and be reasonably tailored to include only that
material for which a public interest requires disclosure.
(c) A video recording disclosed under this subsection must, prior to disclosure, be edited in a
manner as to render the faces of all persons within the recording unidentifiable.
(41) The contents of tips reported to a tip line, as defined  in ORS 339.329. However, personally
identifiable information, as defined in ORS 339.329, is  not subject to public interest balancing under
this section and remains exempt from disclosure except as provided in ORS 339.329.
(42) Residential addresses of individuals with intellectual or developmental disabilities residing
in adult foster homes as  defined in ORS 443.705 or residential training facilities or residential
training homes as those terms are defined in ORS 443.400.
(43) The name, home address, professional address or location  of an individual who is authorized
to provide physical and behavioral health care services in this  state and who provides reproductive
and gender-affirming health care services.
(44)(a) Captured license plate data, as that term is defined in section 3 of this 2026  Act,
collected by an automated license plate recognition  system, as that term is defined in section
3 of this 2026 Act, if the automated license plate recognition system  is deployed or used by
a law enforcement agency. Except that the contents of an audit described in  section 6 of this
2026 Act shall be  disclosed provided that the contents are, prior to disclosure, edited in a
manner as to remove all personally identifiable information,  including any license plate
number or vehicle characteristics relating to a person  whose captured license plate data is
collected by an automated license plate recognition system.
(b) When captured license plate data is subject to conditional disclosure, the  following
apply:
(A) A request  for disclosure under this subsection must identify the approximate date
and time of the collection of captured license plate data  for which the captured license plate
data is requested and be reasonably tailored to include only that material for which  a public
interest requires disclosure.
(B) A video recording or image disclosed under  this subsection must, prior to disclosure,
be edited in a manner as to render the  faces of all persons within the recording or image
unidentifiable.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1516 (SB 1516-A) Page 13
(C) Captured license plate data that has been sealed  in a court’s record of a court pro-
ceeding or otherwise ordered by a court not to be disclosed may not be disclosed, unless
otherwise contained in an audit described in section 6 of this 2026 Act.
(c) Nothing in this subsection shall limit  any right constitutionally guaranteed, or
granted by statute, to disclosure or discovery in criminal cases.
JUSTICE REINVESTMENT EQUITY PROGRAM
SECTION 12.
 Section 15, chapter 78, Oregon Laws 2022, is amended to read:
Sec. 15. (1) The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission shall distribute [ the] any moneys [ received
pursuant to section 14 of  this 2022 Act to the Northwest Health Foundation Fund II to fund ] appro-
priated to the commission for  the Justice Reinvestment Equity Program  as  described in this
section. The program shall consist  of the provision of subgrants and technical assistance [ by the
Northwest Health Foundation  Fund II ], by an intermediary technical assistance provider,  to
culturally specific organizations and culturally responsive service  providers for the following pur-
poses:
(a) Mental health and substance use disorder treatment;
(b) Maternal health services;
(c) Trauma-informed restorative justice services;
(d) Violence reduction programs, including but not  limited to violence interruption mentors or
after-school programs focused on art, music, theater or dance;
(e) Crisis intervention without police involvement;
(f) Reentry programs that are  connected to education, workforce development and transitional
supports;
(g) Long-term supportive housing;
(h) Support for setting aside conviction records;
(i) Pretrial release support;
(j) Services for victims, including incarcerated victims or victims on pretrial release;
(k) Programs for persons, and families of persons, who are currently or  were formerly
incarcerated;
(L) Programs designed to reduce recidivism and reduce contact  with the criminal justice system;
(m) Programs for  persons who have been impacted by police violence, either directly or through
a family member; or
(n) Planning [ grants] subgrants  and technical assistance to support the development of new
culturally specific services, or to strengthen existing services, that are aligned with the  other pur-
poses described in this subsection.
(2) Recognizing that systemic racism exists within this state and within the  criminal justice
system, and that culturally specific organizations  and culturally responsive services must be ex-
panded to address those disparities, the purpose of the Justice Reinvestment Equity  Program is to
promote racial equity, reduce racial disparities, reduce recidivism and decrease a county’s  utiliza-
tion of imprisonment in a Department of  Corrections institution, all while protecting public safety
and holding offenders accountable.
(3)(a) As part of the program,  the commission shall select a culturally responsive tech-
nical assistance provider that has experience working with prior Justice  Reinvestment Eq-
uity Program subgrantees to serve as an intermediary between the commission and  program
subgrantees. The commission shall distribute to the technical  assistance provider, as a
grant, the moneys appropriated to the commission for the program.
(b) The technical assistance provider  shall develop selection criteria and recommenda-
tions for subgrants provided as part  of the program. The commission has approval authority
for final subgrant awards based on the selection criteria and recommendations.
(c) In consultation  with the commission, the technical assistance provider is responsible
for:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1516 (SB 1516-A) Page 14
(A) Oversight and compilation  of fiscal and data reporting that incorporate measures of
success as defined by the technical assistance provider;
(B) Administering the application and subgrant management processes  for program
funding and making recommendations to the commission on final subgrant awards;
(C) Assisting subgrantees with the effective implementation  and management of program
subgrant funds;
(D) Organizational capacity-building, with a focus on effective subgrant management and
performance of subgrant deliverables; and
(E) Developing working relationships between  program subgrantees and other organiza-
tions funded by the commission to the benefit of individuals and the community.
[(3)] (4)  Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, up to three  percent of funds distributed
under this section may  be used by the [ Northwest Health Foundation Fund II ] technical assistance
provider selected by the  commission under subsection (3) of this section  for administrative
costs.
[(4)] (5)  The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission  may adopt rules to carry out the provisions
of this section.
[(5)] (6) As used in this section:
(a) “Administrative costs” means all costs incurred throughout the administration of the Justice
Reinvestment Equity Program  that are not directly related to the delivery of program services or
projects.
(b) “Culturally responsive service” means a service that is respectful of,  and relevant to, the
beliefs, practices, cultures and linguistic needs of diverse consumer or client  populations and com-
munities whose members identify as  having particular cultural or linguistic affiliations by virtue of
their place of birth, ancestry or ethnic origin, religion, preferred language  or language spoken at
home. A culturally responsive  service has the capacity to respond to the issues of diverse commu-
nities and require knowledge and capacity at systemic, organizational,  professional and individual
levels of intervention.
(c) “Culturally specific organization”  means an organization, or a program within an organiza-
tion, that serves a particular cultural community, that is primarily staffed and led by members of
that community and that demonstrates self-advocacy, positive cultural identity  and intimate know-
ledge of the lived experience of the community, including but not limited to:
(A) The impact of structural and individual racism or discrimination on the community;
(B) Specific disparities in access to services and resources experienced by the community; and
(C) Community strengths, cultural practices, beliefs and traditions.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 13.
The unit and section captions used in this 2026 Act are provided only  for
the convenience of the reader  and do not become part of the statutory law of this state or
express any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2026 Act.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 14. This 2026 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2026 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1516 (SB 1516-A) Page 15
Passed by Senate February 20, 2026
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House March 5, 2026
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1516 (SB 1516-A) Page 16